California statutes. Water Code
(a) Of the funds authorized by Section 79730, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for projects to protect and enhance an urban creek, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 7048, and its tributaries, pursuant to Division 22.8 (commencing with Section 32600) of, and Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000) of, the Public Resources Code and Section 79508.

(b) (1) Of the funds authorized by Section 79730, twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be made available to the secretary for a competitive program to fund multibenefit watershed and urban rivers enhancement projects in urban watersheds that increase regional and local water self-sufficiency and that meet at least two of the following objectives:

(A) Promote groundwater recharge and water reuse.

(B) Reduce energy consumption.

(C) Use soils, plants, and natural processes to treat runoff.

(D) Create or restore native habitat.

(E) Increase regional and local resiliency and adaptability to climate
 change.

(2) The program under this subdivision shall be implemented by state conservancies, the Wildlife Conservation Board, the state board, or other entities whose jurisdiction includes urban watersheds, as designated by the secretary. Projects funded under the program shall be a part of a plan developed jointly by the conservancies, the Wildlife Conservation Board, the state board, or other designated entities in consultation with the secretary.

(c) At least 25 percent of the funds available pursuant to this section shall be allocated for projects that benefit disadvantaged communities.

(d) Up to 10 percent of the funds available pursuant to this section may be allocated for project planning.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79736.

Of the funds authorized by Section 79730, four hundred seventy-five million dollars ($475,000,000) shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency to support projects that fulfill the obligations of the State of California in complying with the terms of any of the following:

(a) Subsection (d) of Section 3406 of the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (Title 34 of Public Law 102-575).

(b) Interstate compacts set forth in Section 66801 of the Government Code pursuant to Title 7.42 (commencing with Section 66905) of the Government Code.

(c) Intrastate or multiparty water quantification settlement agreement provisions, including ecosystem restoration projects, as set forth in Chapters 611, 612, 613, and 614 of the Statutes of 2003.

(d) The settlement agreement referenced in Section 2080.2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(e) Any intrastate or multiparty settlement agreement related to water acted upon or before December 31, 2013. Priority shall be given to projects that meet one or more of the following criteria:

(1) The project is of statewide significance.

(2) The project restores natural aquatic or riparian functions, or wetlands habitat for birds and aquatic species.

(3) The project protects or promotes the restoration of endangered or threatened species.

(4) The project enhances the reliability of water supplies on a regional or interregional basis.

(5) The project provides significant regional or statewide economic benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79737.

(a) Of the funds authorized by Section 79730, two hundred eighty-five million dollars ($285,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for watershed restoration projects statewide in accordance with this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of this section, watershed restoration includes activities to fund coastal wetland habitat, improve forest health, restore mountain meadows, modernize stream crossings, culverts, and bridges, reconnect historical flood plains, install or improve fish screens, provide fish passages, restore river channels, restore or enhance riparian, aquatic, and terrestrial habitat, improve ecological functions, acquire from willing sellers
 conservation easements for riparian buffer strips, improve local watershed
 management, and remove sediment or trash.

(c) For any funds available pursuant to this section that are used to provide grants under the Fisheries Restoration Grant Program, a priority shall be given to coastal waters.

(d) In allocating funds for projects pursuant to this section, the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall only make funds available for water quality, river, and watershed protection and restoration projects of statewide importance outside of the Delta.

(e) Funds provided by this section shall not be expended to pay the costs of the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of Delta conveyance facilities.

(f) Funds provided by this section shall only be used for projects that will provide fisheries or ecosystem benefits or improvements that are greater than required applicable environmental mitigation measures or compliance obligations, except for any water transfers for the benefit of subsection (d) of Section 3406 of the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (Title 34 of Public Law 102-575).

(g) In order to address the unique ecological, flood control, water quality, and hydrological conditions associated with urban creeks and watersheds on the California-Mexico border, the department shall consult with the California-Mexico Border Relations Council to
 establish criteria to fund projects that improve conditions for cross-border urban creeks and watersheds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 668, Sec. 10.   (AB 965)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, and approved in Prop. 1 on Nov. 4, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79738.

(a) Of the funds authorized by Section 79730, eighty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($87,500,000) shall be available to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for water quality, ecosystem restoration, and fish protection facilities that benefit the Delta, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Projects to improve water quality or that contribute to the improvement of water quality
 in the Delta, including projects in Delta counties that provide multiple public benefits and improve drinking and agricultural water quality or water supplies.

(2) Habitat restoration, conservation, and enhancement projects to improve the condition of special status, at risk, endangered, or threatened species in the Delta and the Delta counties, including projects to eradicate invasive species, and projects that support the beneficial reuse of dredged material for habitat restoration and levee improvements.

(3) Scientific studies and assessments that support the Delta Science Program, as described in Section 85280, or projects under this section.

(b) In implementing this section, the department shall coordinate and consult with the Delta city or Delta county in which a grant is proposed to be expended or an interest
 in real property is proposed to be acquired.

(c) Acquisitions pursuant to this section shall be from willing sellers only.

(d) In implementing this section state agencies shall prioritize wildlife conservation objectives through projects on public lands or voluntary projects on private lands, to the extent feasible.

(e) Funds available pursuant to this section shall not be used to acquire land via eminent domain.

(f) Funds available pursuant to this section shall not be expended to pay the costs of the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of Delta conveyance facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Regional Water Security, Climate, and Drought Preparedness [79740. - 79748.]

79740.

The sum of eight hundred ten million dollars ($810,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature from the fund, for expenditures on, and competitive grants and loans to, projects that are included in and implemented in an adopted integrated regional water management plan consistent with Part 2.2 (commencing with Section 10530) of Division 6 and respond to climate change and contribute to regional water security as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79741.

In order to improve regional water self-reliance security and adapt to the effects on water supply arising out of climate change, the purposes of this chapter are to:

(a) Help water infrastructure systems adapt to climate change, including, but not limited to, sea level rise.

(b) Provide incentives for water agencies throughout each watershed to collaborate in
 managing the region’s water resources and setting regional priorities for water infrastructure.

(c) Improve regional water self-reliance consistent with Section 85021.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79742.

(a) In selecting among proposed projects in a watershed, the scope of the adopted integrated regional water management plan may be considered by the administering state agency, with priority going to projects in plans that cover a greater portion of the watershed. If a plan covers substantially all of the watershed, the plan’s project priorities shall be given deference if the project and plan otherwise meet the requirements of this division and the Integrated
 Regional Water Management Planning Act (Part 2.2 (commencing with Section 10530) of Division 6).

(b) A local agency that does not prepare, adopt, and submit its groundwater plan in accordance with groundwater planning requirements established under Division 6 (commencing with Section 10000) is ineligible to apply for funds made available pursuant to this chapter until the plan is prepared and submitted in accordance with the requirements of that part. The groundwater management plan requirement shall not apply to a water replenishment district formed pursuant to Division 18 (commencing with Section 60000) or to a local agency that serves or has authority to manage an adjudicated groundwater basin.

(c) For the purposes of awarding funding under this chapter, a cost share from nonstate sources of not less than 50 percent of the total costs of the project shall be required. The
 cost-sharing requirement may be waived or reduced for projects that directly benefit a disadvantaged community or an economically distressed area.

(d) Not less than 10 percent of the funds authorized by this chapter shall be allocated to projects that directly benefit disadvantaged communities.

(e) For the purposes of awarding funding under this chapter, the applicant shall demonstrate that the integrated regional water management plan the applicant’s project implements contributes to addressing the risks in the region to water supply and water infrastructure arising from climate change.

(f) Projects that achieve multiple benefits shall receive special consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79743.

Subject to the determination of regional priorities in the regional water management group, eligible projects may include, but are not limited to, projects that promote any of the following:

(a) Water reuse and recycling for nonpotable reuse and direct and indirect potable reuse.

(b) Water-use efficiency and water conservation.

(c) Local and regional surface and underground water storage, including groundwater aquifer cleanup or recharge projects.

(d) Regional water conveyance facilities that improve integration of separate water systems.

(e) Watershed protection, restoration, and management projects, including projects that reduce the risk of wildfire or improve water supply reliability.

(f) Stormwater resource management, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Projects to reduce, manage, treat, or capture rainwater or stormwater.

(2) Projects that provide multiple benefits such as water quality, water supply, flood control, or open
 space.

(3) Decision support tools that evaluate the benefits and costs of multibenefit stormwater projects.

(4) Projects to implement a stormwater resource plan developed in accordance with Part 2.3 (commencing with Section 10560) of Division 6.

(g) Conjunctive use of surface and groundwater storage facilities.

(h) Water desalination projects.

(i) Decision support tools to model regional water management strategies to account for climate change and other changes in regional demand and supply projections.

(j) Improvement of water quality, including drinking water treatment and distribution, groundwater and aquifer remediation,
 matching water quality to water use, wastewater treatment, water pollution prevention, and management of urban and agricultural runoff.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79744.

(a) Of the funds authorized by Section 79740, five hundred ten million dollars ($510,000,000) shall be allocated to the hydrologic regions as identified in the California Water Plan in accordance with this section. For the South Coast hydrologic region, the department shall establish three funding areas that reflect the watersheds of San Diego County and southern Orange County (designated as the San Diego subregion), the Santa Ana River watershed (designated as the
 Santa Ana subregion), and the Los Angeles and Ventura County watersheds (designated as the Los Angeles subregion), and shall allocate funds to those areas in accordance with this subdivision. The North and South Lahontan hydrologic regions shall be treated as one area for the purpose of allocating funds. For purposes of this subdivision, the Sacramento River hydrologic region does not include the Delta. For purposes of this subdivision, the Mountain Counties Overlay is not eligible for funds from the Sacramento River hydrologic region or the San Joaquin River hydrologic region. Multiple integrated regional water management plans may be recognized in each of the areas allocated funding.

(b) Funds made available by this chapter shall be allocated as follows:

(1) Twenty-six million five hundred thousand dollars ($26,500,000) for the North Coast hydrologic region.

(2) Sixty-five million dollars ($65,000,000) for the San Francisco Bay hydrologic region.

(3) Forty-three million dollars ($43,000,000) for the Central Coast hydrologic region.

(4) Ninety-eight million dollars ($98,000,000) for the Los Angeles subregion.

(5) Sixty-three million dollars ($63,000,000) for the Santa Ana subregion.

(6) Fifty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($52,500,000) for the San Diego subregion.

(7) Thirty-seven million dollars ($37,000,000) for the Sacramento River hydrologic region.

(8) Thirty-one million dollars ($31,000,000) for the
 San Joaquin River hydrologic region.

(9) Thirty-four million dollars ($34,000,000) for the Tulare/Kern hydrologic region.

(10) Twenty-four million five hundred thousand dollars ($24,500,000) for the North/South Lahontan hydrologic region.

(11) Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($22,500,000) for the Colorado River Basin hydrologic region.

(12) Thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000) for the Mountain Counties Overlay.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79745.

The Department of Water Resources shall expend, either directly or for noncompetitive grants, no less than 10 percent of the funds from the regional allocations specified in Section 79744 for the purposes of ensuring involvement of disadvantaged communities, economically distressed areas, or underrepresented communities within regions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79746.

(a) Of the funds authorized by Section 79740, the sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) may be used for direct expenditures, and for grants and loans, for the following water conservation and water-use efficiency plans, projects, and programs:

(1) Urban water conservation plans, projects, and programs, including regional projects and programs, implemented to achieve urban water use targets
 developed pursuant to Section 10608.20. Priority for funding shall be given to programs that do any of the following:

(A) Assist water suppliers and regions to implement conservation programs and measures that are not locally cost effective.

(B) Support water supplier and regional efforts to implement programs targeted to enhance water-use efficiency for commercial, industrial, and institutional water users.

(C) Assist water suppliers and regions with programs and measures targeted toward realizing the conservation benefits of implementation of the provisions of the state landscape model ordinance.

(2) Agricultural water management plans or agricultural water use efficiency projects and programs developed pursuant to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section
 10800) of Division 6.

(b) Section 1011 applies to all conservation measures that an agricultural water supplier or an urban water supplier implements with funding under this chapter. This subdivision does not limit the application of Section 1011 to any other measures or projects implemented by a water supplier. Notwithstanding Section 79748, the projects funded pursuant to this section are not required to be in an adopted integrated regional water management plan or to comply with that program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79747.

(a) Of the funds authorized by Section 79740, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) shall be available for grants for multibenefit stormwater management projects.

(b) Eligible projects may include, but shall not be limited to, green infrastructure, rainwater and stormwater capture projects, and stormwater treatment facilities.

(c) Development of plans for stormwater projects shall address the entire watershed and incorporate the perspectives of communities adjacent to the affected waterways, especially disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79748.

In order to receive funding authorized by this chapter to address groundwater quality or supply in an aquifer, the applicant shall demonstrate that a public agency has authority to manage the water resources in that aquifer. A groundwater management plan adopted and submitted in accordance with groundwater management planning requirements established under Division 6 (commencing with Section 10000) shall be deemed sufficient to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Statewide Water System Operational Improvement and Drought Preparedness [79750. - 79760.]

79750.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 162, the commission may make the determinations, findings, and recommendations required of it by this chapter independent of the views of the director. All final actions by the commission in implementing this chapter shall be taken by a majority of the members of the commission at a public meeting noticed and held pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3
 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the sum of two billion seven hundred million dollars ($2,700,000,000) is hereby continuously appropriated from the fund, without regard to fiscal years, to the commission for public benefits associated with water storage projects that improve the operation of the state water system, are cost effective, and provide a net improvement in ecosystem and water quality conditions, in accordance with this chapter. Funds authorized for, or made available to, the commission pursuant to this chapter shall be available and expended only for the purposes provided in this chapter, and shall not be subject to appropriation or transfer by the Legislature or the Governor for any other purpose.

(c) Projects shall be selected by the commission through a competitive public process that ranks potential
 projects based on the expected return for public investment as measured by the magnitude of the public benefits provided, pursuant to criteria established under this chapter.

(d) Any project constructed with funds provided by this chapter shall be subject to Section 11590.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79751.

Projects for which the public benefits are eligible for funding under this chapter consist of only the following:

(a) Surface storage projects identified in the CALFED Bay-Delta Program Record of Decision, dated August 28, 2000, except for projects prohibited by Chapter 1.4 (commencing with Section 5093.50) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Groundwater storage projects and groundwater contamination prevention or remediation projects that provide water storage benefits.

(c) Conjunctive use and reservoir reoperation projects.

(d) Local and regional surface storage projects that improve the operation of water systems in the state and provide public benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79752.

A project shall not be funded pursuant to this chapter unless it provides measurable improvements to the Delta ecosystem or to the tributaries to the Delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79753.

(a) Funds allocated pursuant to this chapter may be expended solely for the following public benefits associated with water storage projects:

(1) Ecosystem improvements, including changing the timing of water diversions, improvement in flow conditions, temperature, or other benefits that contribute to restoration of aquatic ecosystems and native fish and wildlife, including those ecosystems and fish and
 wildlife in the Delta.

(2) Water quality improvements in the Delta, or in other river systems, that provide significant public trust resources, or that clean up and restore groundwater resources.

(3) Flood control benefits, including, but not limited to, increases in flood reservation space in existing reservoirs by exchange for existing or increased water storage capacity in response to the effects of changing hydrology and decreasing snow pack on California’s water and flood management system.

(4) Emergency response, including, but not limited to, securing emergency water supplies and flows for dilution and salinity repulsion following a natural disaster or act of terrorism.

(5) Recreational purposes, including, but not limited to, those recreational
 pursuits generally associated with the outdoors.

(b) Funds shall not be expended pursuant to this chapter for the costs of environmental mitigation measures or compliance obligations except for those associated with providing the public benefits as described in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79754.

In consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the state board, and the Department of Water Resources, the commission shall develop and adopt, by regulation, methods for quantification and management of public benefits described in Section 79753 by December 15, 2016. The regulations shall include the priorities and relative environmental value of ecosystem benefits as provided by the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the priorities and relative environmental value of water
 quality benefits as provided by the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79755.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), no funds allocated pursuant to this chapter may be allocated for a project before December 15, 2016, and until the commission approves the project based on the commission’s determination that all of the following have occurred:

(1) The commission has adopted the regulations specified in Section 79754 and specifically quantified and made public the cost of the
 public benefits associated with the project.

(2) The project applicant has entered into a contract with each party that will derive benefits, other than public benefits, as defined in Section 79753, from the project that ensures the party will pay its share of the total costs of the project. The benefits available to a party shall be consistent with that party’s share of total project costs.

(3) The project applicant has entered into a contract with each public agency identified in Section 79754 that administers the public benefits, after that agency makes a finding that the public benefits of the project for which that agency is responsible meet all the requirements of this chapter, to ensure that the public contribution of funds pursuant to this chapter achieves the public benefits identified for the project.

(4) The commission has held a public hearing for the purposes of providing an opportunity for the public to review and comment on the information required to be prepared pursuant to this subdivision.

(5) All of the following additional conditions are met:

(A) Feasibility studies have been completed.

(B) The commission has found and determined that the project is feasible, is consistent with all applicable laws and regulations, and will advance the long-term objectives of restoring ecological health and improving water management for beneficial uses of the Delta.

(C) All environmental documentation associated with the project has been completed, and all other federal, state, and local approvals, certifications, and agreements required to be
 completed have been obtained.

(b) The commission shall submit to the Legislature its findings for each of the criteria identified in subdivision (a) for a project funded pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), funds may be made available under this chapter for the completion of environmental documentation and permitting of a project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79756.

(a) The public benefit cost share of a project funded pursuant to this chapter, other than a project described in subdivision (c) of Section 79751, shall not exceed 50 percent of the total costs of any project funded under this chapter.

(b) No project may be funded unless it provides ecosystem improvements as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 79753 that are at least 50 percent of
 total public benefits of the project funded under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79757.

(a) A project is not eligible for funding under this chapter unless, by January 1, 2022, all of the following conditions are met:

(1) All feasibility studies are complete and draft environmental documentation is available for public review.

(2) The commission makes a finding that the project is feasible, and will advance the long-term
 objectives of restoring ecological health and improving water management for beneficial uses of the Delta.

(3) The director receives commitments for not less than 75 percent of the nonpublic benefit cost share of the project.

(b) If compliance with subdivision (a) is delayed by litigation or failure to promulgate regulations, the date in subdivision (a) shall be extended by the commission for a time period that is equal to the time period of the delay, and funding under this chapter that has been dedicated to the project shall be encumbered until the time at which the litigation is completed or the regulations have been promulgated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79758.

Surface storage projects funded pursuant to this chapter and described in subdivision (a) of Section 79751 may be made a unit of the Central Valley Project as provided in Section 11290 and may be financed, acquired, constructed, operated, and maintained pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79759.

(a) The funds allocated for the design, acquisition, and construction of surface storage projects identified in the CALFED Bay-Delta Record of Decision, dated August 28, 2000, pursuant to this chapter may be provided for those purposes to local joint powers authorities formed by irrigation districts and other local water districts and local governments within the applicable hydrologic region to design, acquire, and construct those projects.

(b) The joint powers authorities described in subdivision (a) may include in their membership governmental partners that are not located within their respective hydrologic regions in financing the surface storage projects, including, as appropriate, cost share participation or equity participation. Notwithstanding Section 6525 of the Government Code, the joint powers agencies described in subdivision (a) shall not include in their membership any for-profit corporation or any mutual water company whose shareholders and members include a for-profit corporation or any other private entity. The department shall be an ex officio member of each joint powers authority subject to this section, but the department shall not control the governance, management, or operation of the surface water storage projects.

(c) A joint powers authority subject to this section shall own, govern, manage, and
 operate a surface water storage project, subject to the requirement that the ownership, governance, management, and operation of the surface water storage project shall advance the purposes set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79760.

(a) In approving the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Act of 2014, the people were informed and hereby declare that the provisions of this chapter are necessary, integral, and essential to meeting the single object or work of the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Act of 2014. As such, any amendment of the provisions of this chapter by the Legislature without voter approval would frustrate the scheme and design that induced
 voter approval of this act. The people therefore find and declare that any amendment of the provisions of this chapter by the Legislature shall require an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the membership in each house of the Legislature and voter approval.

(b) This section shall not govern or be used as authority for determining whether the amendment of any other provision of this act not contained in this chapter would constitute a substantial change in the scheme and design of this act requiring voter approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Water Recycling [79765. - 79768.]

79765.

The sum of seven hundred twenty-five million dollars ($725,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature from the fund, for grants or loans for water recycling and advanced treatment technology projects, including all of the following:

(a) Water recycling projects, including, but not limited to, treatment, storage, conveyance, and distribution facilities for potable and nonpotable recycling projects.

(b) Contaminant and salt removal projects, including, but not limited to, groundwater and seawater desalination and associated treatment, storage, conveyance, and distribution facilities.

(c) Dedicated distribution infrastructure to serve residential, commercial, agricultural, and industrial end-user retrofit projects to allow use of recycled water.

(d) Pilot projects for new potable reuse and other salt and contaminant removal technology.

(e) Multibenefit recycled water projects that improve water quality.

(f) Technical assistance and grant writing assistance for disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79766.

At least a 50-percent local cost share shall be required for projects funded pursuant to this chapter. That cost share may be suspended or reduced for disadvantaged communities and economically distressed areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79767.

Projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall be selected on a competitive basis, considering all of the following criteria:

(a) Water supply reliability improvement.

(b) Water quality and ecosystem benefits related to decreased reliance on diversions from the Delta or instream flows.

(c) Public
 health benefits from improved drinking water quality or supply.

(d) Cost-effectiveness.

(e) Energy efficiency and greenhouse gas emission impacts.

(f) Reasonable geographic allocation to eligible projects throughout the state, including both northern and southern California and coastal and inland regions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79768.

For purposes of this chapter, competitive programs shall be implemented consistent with water recycling programs administered pursuant to Sections 79140 and 79141 or consistent with desalination programs administered pursuant to Sections 79545 and 79547.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Groundwater Sustainability [79770. - 79775.]

79770.

Prevention and cleanup of groundwater contamination are critical components of successful groundwater management. Groundwater quality becomes especially important as water providers do the following:

(a) Evaluate investments in groundwater recharge with surface water, stormwater, recycled water, and other conjunctive use projects that augment local groundwater supplies to improve regional water self-reliance.

(b) Adapt to changing hydrologic conditions brought on by climate change.

(c) Consider developing groundwater basins to provide much needed local storage options to accommodate hydrologic and regulatory variability in the state’s water delivery system.

(d) Evaluate investments in groundwater recovery projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79771.

(a) The sum of nine hundred million dollars ($900,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature from the fund, for expenditures on, and competitive grants, and loans for, projects to prevent or clean up the contamination of groundwater that serves or has served as a source of drinking water. Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall be available to the state board for projects necessary to protect public health by preventing or reducing
 the contamination of groundwater that serves or has served as a major source of drinking water for a community.

(b) Projects shall be prioritized based upon the following criteria:

(1) The threat posed by groundwater contamination to the affected community’s overall drinking water supplies, including an urgent need for treatment of alternative supplies or increased water imports if groundwater is not available due to contamination.

(2) The potential for groundwater contamination to spread and impair drinking water supply and water storage for nearby population areas.

(3) The potential of the project, if fully implemented, to enhance local water supply reliability.

(4) The potential of the
 project to maximize opportunities to recharge vulnerable, high-use groundwater basins and optimize groundwater supplies.

(5) The project addresses contamination at a site for which the courts or the appropriate regulatory authority has not yet identified responsible parties, or where the identified responsible parties are unwilling or unable to pay for the total cost of cleanup, including water supply reliability improvement for critical urban water supplies in designated superfund areas with groundwater contamination listed on the National Priorities List established pursuant to Section 105(a)(8)(B) of the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605(a)(8)(B)).

(c) Funding authorized by this chapter shall not be used to pay any share of the costs of remediation recovered from parties responsible for the contamination
 of a groundwater storage aquifer, but may be used to pay costs that cannot be recovered from responsible parties. Parties that receive funding for remediating groundwater storage aquifers shall exercise reasonable efforts to recover the costs of groundwater cleanup from the parties responsible for the contamination. Funds recovered from responsible parties may only be used to fund treatment and remediation activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79772.

Of the funds authorized by Section 79771, eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) shall be available for grants for treatment and remediation activities that prevent or reduce the contamination of groundwater that serves as a source of drinking water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)